New York, session 2025-2026, S8363.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "individual 2 counseling rate enhancement act". 3 § 2. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 19.18-d 4 to read as follows: 5 § 19.18-d Individual counseling rate enhancement. 6 1. The office shall establish a rate enhancement for reimbursement of 7 individual psychotherapy services provided to individuals by a mental 8 health counselor licensed pursuant to article one hundred sixty-three of 9 the education law or a clinical social worker licensed pursuant to arti- 10 cle one hundred fifty-four of the education law or a psychologist 11 licensed pursuant to article one hundred fifty-three of the education 12 law where such services are provided in outpatient substance use disor- 13 der clinics licensed pursuant to article thirty-two of this chapter. 14 Such rate shall be no less than the rate established by the office for 15 individual counseling in effect on the first of April next succeeding 16 the date on which this section takes effect plus a service rate of 50%. 17 2. The office shall promulgate regulations to implement the rate 18 enhancement set forth under this section. In developing such rates the 19 office, in consultation with the department of health, shall, if neces- 20 sary, pursue federal Medicaid participation and reimbursement. Within 21 thirty-six months of the establishment of the enhanced rate, the office EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13259-02-6 S. 8363--A 2 1 shall evaluate and report whether the access to integrated mental health 2 and addiction recovery services increased. The office shall transmit 3 such report to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, the 4 speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the senate and the 5 minority leader of the assembly. 6 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.